Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.310

Library records.

Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of library materials, or to gain access to information, that discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 411.]